Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,163
State agricultural resources, industries, and development; department; publications; powers.

(1) The Department of Agriculture may provide information in reference to the state's agricultural resources, industries, and development and may assemble data relating to such resources, industries, and development. The department may publish the facts ascertained and may charge for departmental publications an amount not to exceed the cost of collecting, publishing, and distributing such information for the purposes of sections 81-201, 81-2,163, and 81-2,164.03.

(2) The Department of Agriculture may cooperate with the federal government, farm industry groups or associations, and any other person in assembling and disseminating information relating to agricultural products produced throughout the state.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. III, art. XXI, § 1, p. 545;

C.S.1922, § 7640;

C.S.1929, § 81-2501;

R.S.1943, § 81-2,163;

Laws 1986, LB 795, § 1;

Laws 2018, LB135, § 1.